Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201260-352.01
Temporarily handicapped or disabled
person, defined.

Temporarily
handicapped or disabled person means any handicapped or disabled person whose
personal mobility is expected to be limited as described in section 60-331.02
for no longer than one year.

Laws 2011, LB163, § 21.